Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
343

ENVIRONMENTAL
IMPACT STATEMENTS

Section

343-1 Findings and purpose

343-2 Definitions

343-3 Public records and notice

343-4 Repealed

343-5 Applicability and requirements

343-5.5 Exception to applicability of chapter

343-6 Rules

343-6.5 Waiahole water system; exemption

343-7 Limitation of actions

343-8 Severability

Note

Broadband services; exemption from certain permitting
requirements. L 2011, c 151; L 2013, c 264, §3; L 2016, c 193, §§1, 2.

Department of transportation's bridge rehabilitation and
replacement program; temporary exemption from certain construction requirements
of this chapter through June 30, 2017 or until completion. L 2012, c 218.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Law Journals and Reviews

Ke Ala Pono--The Path of Justice: The Moon Court's Native
Hawaiian Rights Decisions. 33 UH L. Rev. 447 (2011).

The Moon Court's Environmental Review Jurisprudence: Throwing
Open the Courthouse Doors to Beneficial Public Participation. 33 UH L. Rev.
581 (2011).

A Suggested Framework for Judicial Review of Challenges to
the Adequacy of an Environmental Impact Statement Prepared under the Hawaii
Environmental Policy Act. 18 UH L. Rev. 719.

Determining the Expiration Date of an Environmental Impact
Statement: When to Supplement a Stale EIS in Hawai‘i. 35 UH L. Rev. 249
(2013).

Case Notes

Environmental impact statement addressed all statutory
requirements of chapter, was compiled in good faith, and set forth sufficient
information to enable decisionmaker to consider fully the environmental factors
involved. 81 H. 171, 914 P.2d 1364.

Chapter does not conflict with Hawaiian homes commission act,
has only incidental impact on Hawaiian home lands, and is not inconsistent with
interests of the beneficiaries; thus, chapter applies to Hawaiian home lands.
87 H. 91, 952 P.2d 379.

HHCA §204 not violated by application of this chapter. 87 H.
91, 952 P.2d 379.

Where lease was executed in contravention of this chapter,
power plant developers were not "existing Hawaiian homes commission act
lessees"; trial court's decision that the lease was void did not deprive
developers of any interest they were entitled to under the law. 106 H. 270,
103 P.3d 939.

Appellants established standing where they showed threatened
injuries under the traditional injury-in-fact test and procedural injuries
based on a procedural right test; the threatened injury in fact was due to
defendant's decision to go forward with harbor improvements and allow the
superferry project to operate at Kahului harbor without conducting an
environmental assessment; the procedural injury was based on various interests
appellants identified that were threatened due to the violation of their
procedural rights under this chapter. 115 H. 299, 167 P.3d 292.

Where the record showed that the department of transportation
did not consider whether its facilitation of the Hawaii superferry project
would probably have minimal or no significant impacts, both primary and
secondary, on the environment, its determination that the improvements to
Kahului harbor were exempt from the requirements of this chapter was erroneous
as a matter of law; the exemption thus being invalid, the environmental
assessment of §343-5 was applicable. 115 H. 299, 167 P.3d 292.

Where nothing in §607-25 indicated that §607-25 should
provide the exclusive means for awarding attorney's fees and costs against a
party for a violation of this chapter, §607-25 was not the exclusive means for
awarding attorney's fees and costs for violations of this chapter. 120 H. 181,
202 P.3d 1226.

There is nothing in this chapter to indicate that an
archeological inventory survey is a "necessary study" for the completion
of an environmental impact statement. 128 H. 53, 283 P.3d 60 (2012).

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next